Colorado, session 2026A, SB176.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. Short title. The short title of this act is the "No
Kings Act".
SECTION 2. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 13-20-1302 as
follows:
13-20-1302. Liability for violation of constitutional rights -
relief - attorney fees - immunity - time limit to commence action -
definition.
(1) A PERSON WHO, UNDER COLOR OF ANY LAW, STATUTE,
ORDINANCE, REGULATION, CUSTOM, OR USAGE, SUBJECTS, OR CAUSES TO
BE SUBJECTED, A PERSON IN COLORADO TO THE DEPRIVATION OF ANY
RIGHTS, PRIVILEGES, OR IMMUNITIES SECURED BY THE UNITED STATES
CONSTITUTION IS LIABLE TO THE INJURED PARTY IN AN ACTION AT LAW,
SUIT IN EQUITY, OR OTHER PROPER PROCEEDING FOR REDRESS; EXCEPT
THAT, IN AN ACTION BROUGHT AGAINST A JUDICIAL OFFICER FOR AN ACT
OR OMISSION TAKEN IN THE OFFICER'S JUDICIAL CAPACITY, INJUNCTIVE
RELIEF SHALL NOT BE GRANTED UNLESS A DECLARATORY DECREE WAS
VIOLATED OR DECLARATORY RELIEF WAS UNAVAILABLE.
(2) (a) IN AN ACTION OR PROCEEDING BROUGHT PURSUANT TO THIS
SECTION, THE COURT, IN ITS DISCRETION, MAY ALLOW A PREVAILING
PLAINTIFF REASONABLE ATTORNEY FEES AS PART OF THE COSTS; EXCEPT
THAT, IN AN ACTION BROUGHT AGAINST A JUDICIAL OFFICER FOR AN ACT
OR OMISSION TAKEN IN THE OFFICER'S JUDICIAL CAPACITY, THE OFFICER
SHALL NOT BE HELD LIABLE FOR ANY COSTS, INCLUDING ATTORNEY FEES,
UNLESS THE OFFICER'S ACT OR OMISSION WAS CLEARLY IN EXCESS OF THE
-2- SB26-176

OFFICER'S JURISDICTION.
(b) IN AWARDING ATTORNEY FEES PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION
(2)(a) OF THIS SECTION, THE COURT, IN ITS DISCRETION, MAY INCLUDE
EXPERT FEES AS PART OF THE ATTORNEY FEES.
(c) WHEN A JUDGMENT IS ENTERED IN FAVOR OF A DEFENDANT,
THE COURT MAY AWARD REASONABLE COSTS AND ATTORNEY FEES TO THE
DEFENDANT FOR DEFENDING ANY CLAIMS THE COURT FINDS FRIVOLOUS.
(3) PURSUANT TO SECTION 13-80-102, A CIVIL ACTION BROUGHT
PURSUANT TO THIS SECTION MUST BE COMMENCED WITHIN TWO YEARS
AFTER THE CAUSE OF ACTION ACCRUES.
(4) A DEFENDANT IN AN ACTION BROUGHT PURSUANT TO THIS
SECTION MAY ASSERT A DEFENSE OF ABSOLUTE OR QUALIFIED IMMUNITY
TO THE SAME EXTENT AS A PERSON SUED UNDER 42 U.S.C. SEC. 1983
UNDER LIKE CIRCUMSTANCES.
(5) AS USED IN THIS SECTION, "COLOR OF ANY LAW, STATUTE,
ORDINANCE, REGULATION, CUSTOM, OR USAGE" INCLUDES COLOR OF ANY
LAW, STATUTE, ORDINANCE, REGULATION, CUSTOM, OR USAGE OF THE
UNITED STATES AND OF COLORADO AND A POLITICAL SUBDIVISION
THEREOF.
SECTION 3. In Colorado Revised Statutes, 13-80-102, amend
(1)(k); and add (1)(l) as follows:
13-80-102. General limitation of actions - two years.
(1) The following civil actions, regardless of the theory upon
which suit is brought, or against whom suit is brought, must be
commenced within two years after the cause of action accrues, and not
thereafter:
(k) All actions brought under PURSUANT TO section 13-21-109 (2);
-3- SB26-176

AND
(l) AN ACTION ALLEGING A DEPRIVATION OF CONSTITUTIONAL
RIGHTS BROUGHT PURSUANT TO SECTION 13-20-1302.
SECTION 4. Severability. If any provision of this act or the
application of this act to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the
invalidity does not affect other provisions or applications of the act that
can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to
this end the provisions of this act are declared to be severable.
SECTION 5. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
-4- SB26-176